ro-RO: Tip de deflector pentru muștiuc de saxofon soprano: Concav; Plat; Treaptă înaltă; Fără deflector (foarte jos); Roll-over; Treaptă; Altele
fi: Sopraanosaksofonin suukappaleen bafflen tyyppi: Kovera; Tasainen; Korkea kynnys; Ei kynnystä (erittäin matala); Roll-over; Kynnys; Muu
th: แบบแผ่นกั้นภายในปากเป่าแซกโซโฟนโซปราโน: เว้า; แบน; ขั้นสูง; ไม่มีแผ่นกั้น (ต่ำมาก); ม้วนข้าม; ขั้น; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di deflettore del bocchino del sassofono soprano: Concavo; Piatto; Gradino alto; Senza tetto (molto basso); Roll-over; A gradino; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta pregrade ustnika sopranskega saksofona: Konkavno; Ravno; Visoka stopnja; Brez pregrade (zelo nizko); Prevračanje; Stopnica; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta baffle umetka usnika sopran saksofona: Konkavno; Ravno; Visoka stepenica; Bez pregrade (vrlo nisko); Prevrnuto (Roll-over); Stepenica; Ostalo
ko: 소프라노 색소폰 마우스피스 배플 유형: 컨케이브; 플랫; 하이 스텝; 배플 없음(매우 낮음); 롤오버; 스텝; 기타
zh-TW: 高音薩克斯風吹嘴導流板類型: 凹面; 平面; 高階梯型; 無反射板 (極低); 翻滾型; 階梯型; 其他
da: Baffeltype for sopransaxofonmundstykke: Konkav; Flad; High step; Ingen baffle (meget lav); Roll-over; Step; Andet
el: Τύπος baffle επιστομίου για σοπράνο σαξόφωνο: Κοίλο; Επίπεδο; High step; Χωρίς διάφραγμα (πολύ χαμηλό); Roll-over; Step; Άλλο
zh-CN: 高音萨克斯笛头反射板类型: 凹形; 平形; 高阶梯形; 无导流板（非常低）; 弧顶形; 阶梯形; 其他
cs: Bafl typ náustku pro sopránový saxofon: Konkávní; Plochý; Vysoký schodek; Bez přepážky (velmi nízká); Roll-over; Schodkovitý; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ náustku pre sopránový saxofón s prepážkou: Konkávny; Plochý; Vysoký schodík; Bez schodíka (veľmi nízky); Roll-over; Schodíkový; Iný
en: Soprano saxophone mouthpiece baffle type: Concave; Flat; High step; No baffle (very low); Roll-over; Step; Other
hu: Szoprán szaxofon fúvóka terelőlemez típusa: Homorú; Lapos; Magas lépcsős; Terelőlap nélküli (nagyon alacsony); Átívelő; Lépcsős; Egyéb
de: Baffle-Typ des Sopransaxophonmundstücks: Konkav; Flach; Hohe Stufe; Ohne Baffle (sehr niedrig); Roll-Over; Stufe; Andere
ja: ソプラノサクソフォンマウスピースバッフルタイプ: コンケーブ; フラット; ハイステップ; バッフルなし (極低); ロールオーバー; ステップ; その他
lt-LT: Sopraninio saksofono kandiklio pertvaros tipas: Įgaubtas; Plokščias; Aukšta pakopa; Be pertvaros (labai žema); Užapvalintas; Pakopinė; Kita
es: Tipo de deflector de la boquilla para saxofón soprano: Cóncavo; Plano; Escalón alto; Sin bafle (muy bajo); Roll-over; Escalón; Otro
nl: Type baffle van mondstuk sopraansaxofoon: Concaaf; Plat; High step; Geen baffle (zeer laag); Roll-over; Step; Anders
tr: Soprano saksafon ağızlık baffle tipi: İçbükey; Düz; Yüksek basamak; Bafflesız (çok düşük); Roll-over; Basamaklı; Diğer
pl: Typ przegrody ustnika saksofonu sopranowego: Wklęsła (concave); Płaska (flat); Wysoki uskok (high step); Brak (bardzo niska); Zaokrąglona (roll-over); Z uskokiem (step); Inny
vi: Loại vách ngăn trong ống thổi của kèn Soprano Saxophone: Lõm; Phẳng; Bậc cao; Không có vách ngăn (rất thấp); Bo cong; Bậc; Khác
fr: Type de chicane pour bec de saxophone soprano: Concave; Plat; Plafond haut; Sans plafond (très bas); Roll-over; En escalier; Autre
pt-BR: Saxofone soprano, tipo de defletor da boquilha: Côncavo; Plano; Degrau alto; Sem defletor (muito baixo); Roll-over; Degrau; Outro
sv: Sopransaxofonmunstycke – typ av baffel: Konkav; Platt; Hög step; Ingen baffel (mycket låg); Roll-over; Step; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de defletor da boquilha do saxofone soprano: Côncavo; Plano; Degrau alto; Sem defletor (muito baixo); Roll-over; Degrau; Outro
nb: Type demper for munnstykke til sopransaksofon: Konkav; Flat; Høyt trinn; Ingen baffel (svært lav); Roll-over; Trinn; Annet
bg-BG: Тип бафъл на мундщук за сопран саксофон: Вдлъбнат; Плосък; Висока стъпка (High step); Без преграда (много ниска); Roll-over; Стъпаловиден; Друго
ru: Тип перегородки мундштука сопрано саксофона: Вогнутый; Плоский; Высокая ступень; Без моста (очень низкий); Закруглённый (Roll-over); Ступенчатый; Другое